Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska32-323
Validity of registration for petition purposes;
when.

Registration pursuant to section 32-304 or 32-308 or by mail
shall not constitute a valid registration for purposes of signing any type
of petition requiring the validation of the signatures of registered voters
until a complete and correct registration application has been received by
the election commissioner or county clerk. A signature on a petition shall
be considered a valid signature as of the date that the election commissioner
or county clerk receives the registration application of the registrant.

Laws 1994, LB 76, § 85;

Laws 1997, LB 764, § 41;

Laws 2005, LB 566, § 24;

Laws 2014, LB661, § 11.